Mississippi, session 2026, SB2466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) The Mississippi Department of Human Services shall submit an amendment to the Mississippi Child Care Development Fund (CCDF) Plan to the Assistant Secretary for Children and Families of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to include the following provisions in the Mississippi Child Care Payment Program (CCPP): (a)  Provide that the following persons who meet the income and asset requirements of the program will be eligible for child care services under the CCPP: (i)  A person enrolled full time in high school who is the parent or primary caregiver of one or more children who reside with that person; (ii)  A person twenty-four (24) years of age or younger who is enrolled full time in college or another educational program or a job training program and who is the parent or primary caregiver of two or more children who reside with that person; (iii)  A person who is disabled and who is the parent or primary caregiver of one or more children who reside with that person; and (iv)  A person who is the grandparent of one or more children who reside with that person and who is the primary caregiver of those children because the child's or children's parent or parents are in a correctional facility. (b)  Provide that a child care provider or the child's parent or primary caregiver may appeal the denial or revocation of eligibility for a child care certificate to the Attorney General's Office, which appeal will be heard by an attorney who is not assigned to the Department of Human Services. (2)  After the plan amendment provided for in subsection (1) of this section is approved, the Department of Human Services shall implement the provisions of the amendment in the CCPP. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.